Tennessee, session 114, SB0066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (19).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-251(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Douglas Henry state museum commission, created by § 4-20-301;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0066
000324
- 1 -